Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 1

General Provisions

12-2-101. Development of natural resources.

The governor is empowered to develop the natural resources of any and all property owned by the state. In order to carry out the provision of this section, the governor may use any of the resources, facilities, and activities of any department of the state. The governor may enter into contracts for the state with any person to do the necessary work that may be required, and if necessary, may lease any of the property at a reasonable rental or royalty in order that any of the mineral and oil resources may be properly developed.

Acts 1919, ch. 191, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 241a2, 241a3; Code 1932, §§ 185, 186; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-201.

12-2-102. Inventory maintained by governor.

The governor is authorized and directed to maintain a complete inventory of all state-owned property, together with necessary surveys, maps, photographs and appraisals, and one (1) copy thereof shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, one (1) with the commissioner of general services, one (1) with the governor, and additional copies with such other public officials as the governor may designate so that the same may be made a part of the permanent records of the state. This inventory shall be added to from time to time as additional property is acquired by the state or by any agency thereof.

Acts 1941, ch. 149, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 186.2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-202; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 35.

Cross-References. Effect of subsequent sections, §12-2-110.

12-2-103. Inventory by commissioner of general services.

The commissioner of general services shall make and maintain a complete inventory in permanent form of all state-owned real property, together with necessary surveys, maps, photographs and appraisals, and when such inventory has been completed, a copy of the same shall be filed in the office of the governor, state treasurer, secretary of state, and such other public officials and departments as the governor may designate. The original copy of the inventory shall remain in the office of the commissioner of general services for safekeeping and be preserved by the commissioner as other public records. Partial copies shall be filed with each department of the state, covering property occupied or used by such department.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.77 (Williams, § 254.20); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-203; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

12-2-104. Conveyances and documents transmitted to commissioner of general services.

It is the duty of each state official who acquires real property by deed, lease or otherwise for the state of Tennessee, upon delivery of the instrument by which the property is conveyed, immediately to transmit the same to the commissioner of general services in order to ensure compliance with §12-2-105. Each state official, having in such state official's custody any deeds, leases, abstracts of title, or certificates of title, is hereby directed to transmit the same to the commissioner.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.80 (Williams, § 254.23); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-204; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

Cross-References. Titles recorded by secretary of state, §8-3-104.

12-2-105. Assembly and recording of conveyances.

It is the duty of the commissioner of general services to collect all deeds to state-owned real property, and record each of the deeds in the county or counties in which the property is located. Thereafter, the commissioner shall transmit to the secretary of state the deeds, and they shall be recorded word for word and indexed in a well-bound book similar in design to the books used by the various county registers. In the event the commissioner is unable to locate any deed to state-owned property, the commissioner shall obtain a certified or photostatic copy of the same, if possible, and file it in such commissioner's office in conformity with this section.

The above procedure shall be followed in connection with any property which the state as lessee has under lease.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.78 (Williams, § 254.21); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-205; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

12-2-106. Payment of registers' fees.

All county registers of this state are required to extend credit to the commissioner of general services for the recordation of various instruments, including deeds and leases, and, after the instruments have been recorded, the county register will submit such county register's bill for services to the commissioner in order to obtain payment of the same.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.85 (Williams, § 254.28); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-206; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

12-2-107. Copies of deeds certified by secretary of state.

The secretary of state is authorized to issue certified copies of deeds to state-owned property which have been recorded in the secretary of state's office, and the same are declared to be admissible as evidence in any court of this state.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.84 (Williams, § 254.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-207.

12-2-108. Permanent records of commissioner of general services — Deeds — Records of leases.

Upon recordation of the deeds by the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall promptly return the same to the commissioner of general services for safekeeping in the commissioner's office as public records, together with abstracts of title, and certificates of title, covering the property.

It is the further duty of the commissioner to keep a permanent record in the commissioner's office of deeds which have come into the commissioner's possession, showing where the property is located, its size, its cost, when acquired, and such other information as the commissioner deems necessary.

Upon recordation of leases by the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall promptly return the same to the commissioner for safekeeping in the commissioner's office. Such leases may be disposed of pursuant to guidelines established by the public records commission; however, such leases must be maintained for a period of no less than seven (7) years from the termination date of the lease. Leases which have been in existence for more than twenty (20) years on June 25, 1991, may be disposed of pursuant to such guidelines established by the public records commission. Prior to disposal of all other leases, the leases shall be microfilmed, and the microfilm shall be preserved pursuant to § 10-7-303(e).

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.79 (Williams, § 254.22); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-208; Acts 1991, ch. 498, §§ 1-3; 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

12-2-109. Withdrawal of papers from commissioner's office.

The commissioner of general services shall not permit any deeds, leases, abstracts of title, certificates of title or other instruments on file in the commissioner's office to be withdrawn or taken therefrom except in instances where it may be necessary to use them in connection with pending or threatened litigation affecting any of the lands, and then the attorney general and reporter may withdraw the papers temporarily from the office of the commissioner of general services for use in connection with such pending or threatened litigation, leaving a descriptive receipt therefor.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.81 (Williams, § 254.24); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-209; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

12-2-110. Provisions in pari materia.

Sections12-2-103 —12-2-111 shall be read in pari materia with §12-2-102, except insofar as those sections are expressly in conflict therewith, and, in the event of such conflict, §§12-2-103 —12-2-111 shall prevail.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 11; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.86 (Williams, § 254.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-210.

12-2-111. Engineer and assistants to commissioner.

The commissioner of general services, on approval of the governor, is empowered to employ a qualified engineer and such other assistants as may be necessary to enable the commissioner to fully perform the duties and to execute the powers conferred by §§12-2-103 —12-2-110.

Acts 1947, ch. 106, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.82 (Williams, § 254.25); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-211; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 36.

12-2-112. Disposal of surplus interests in real property and energy resources.

The commissioner of general services, with the approval of the governor and attorney general and reporter, may sell, lease or otherwise convey any interest in surplus state real property according to the following provisions:

Real property shall not be sold in fee, and any interest or rights in minerals, coal, natural gas, oil, timber and any other energy related resources shall not be conveyed if there is any feasible use for the property by any state agency, as determined by the governor, the attorney general and reporter and the commissioner of general services. Should the state agency have an approved use for the property, the commissioner is authorized to transfer jurisdiction to the appropriate agency at no cost;

As to sales in fee, and to any conveyance of any interest or rights in minerals, coal, natural gas, oil, timber and any other energy-related resources, such property shall be appraised by at least two (2) independent, qualified appraisers, wholly disconnected from state government or any other legal governmental entity except as may otherwise be determined by the state building commission;

As to sales in fee, and to any conveyance of any interest or rights in minerals, coal, natural gas, oil, timber and any other energy-related resources, such surplus property having an average appraised value exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be advertised not less than one (1) time in a newspaper which is local with respect to the property to be sold and once in a newspaper in either Nashville, Memphis, Chattanooga or Knoxville, whichever is nearest by air; provided, that if one (1) of these four (4) cities is the situs of the property to be sold, advertisement shall be made twice within a two-week period. Any interest or rights in minerals, coal, natural gas, oil, timber and any other energy-related resources shall be sold by the sealed bid method with the condition that the state shall have the right to refuse any and all bids. Fee interests in real property shall be sold by the sealed bid method or by public auction in accordance with policies established by the state building commission, with the condition that the state shall have the rights to refuse any and all bids. As used in this subdivision (a)(3), “public auction” may include, without limitation, internet auctions and in-person auctions so long as such auctions are open for participation by the public at large. Upon the approval of the governor, the attorney general and reporter, and the commissioner, the successful bidder will be notified of the intent to award within a period of forty-five (45) days commencing from the date of bid openings;

All interests in real property other than the fee interest, including, but not limited to, leases, easements and rights-of-way, shall be disposed of in accordance with policies established by the state building commission, including advertisement and appraisal where deemed appropriate by the state building commission; provided, however, that, if the property was acquired by or for the use of the department of transportation for right-of-way, then the department of transportation may convey the interests in the property by negotiated sale or disposal to any legal governmental body for a public use purpose, subject to reversion to the department of transportation for failure to continue public ownership and use, or to the former owner or an adjoining owner for fair market value, in accordance with procedures established in subdivision (a)(8). If approved by the department of transportation, and the federal highway administration where required by federal law, a functional replacement of real property may be considered to continue public ownership and use, and shall not be subject to reversion to the department of transportation, if the replacement property is at least equal in fair market value to the property being replaced. For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(4), a functional replacement of real property means real property that serves the same function as the real property conveyed by the state by providing equivalent utility, as determined by the department of transportation, and the federal highway administration where required by federal law. The fair market value of the replacement property shall be determined in accordance with the procedures for determining the fair market value of the surplus property established in subdivision (a)(8). This subdivision (a)(4) shall not apply to the disposal or conveyance in any manner of any interest or rights in minerals, coal, natural gas, oil, timber and any other energy related resources; provided, that the commission shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations over the disposal or conveyances pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

Subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) may be waived to permit the negotiated sale of any such property to any legal governmental body for a public use purpose, and, further, to permit any other negotiated sale or disposal without advertisement or appraisal as the state building commission may deem in the best interest of the state. Subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) may also be waived to permit the commissioner, with the approval of the attorney general and reporter and the governor, to grant such easements and rights-of-way as are deemed necessary to provide services for the benefit of the state agency, department or institution or of the general public; (6) The final conveyance of any property shall be effective to vest in the purchaser thereof such title as the state shall have in the premises; the state shall not be liable upon any covenant of warranty or seisin irrespective of whether or not the same is contained in such conveyance;

The former property owner's right shall terminate ten (10) years after the date of acquisition by the department of transportation by conveyance or date of taking in condemnation of the subject property by the department. The former property owner's right shall not transfer to the owner's heirs. The former property owner shall have first right of refusal to purchase the right-of-way; provided, however, that the department may convey the property or any interest in the property to a legal governmental body for a public use purpose, subject to reversion to the department of transportation for failure to continue public ownership and use, without offering the former owner a first right of refusal to purchase the property. If the former property owner relinquishes the owner's right or the right has expired, the property may be conveyed to a legal governmental body in accordance with subdivision (a)(8)(D) or to an adjoining property owner. If more than one (1) adjoining property owner is interested in purchasing the right-of-way, the interested adjoining property owners shall submit sealed bids to the department of transportation, with the minimum bid price being the fair market value determined by appraisal, and the property may be conveyed to the adjoining property owner offering the highest responsive bid. The successful bidder shall reimburse any unsuccessful prospective purchaser for survey and appraisal costs incurred in accordance with the requirements of this subdivision (a)(8);

For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(8), the fair market value of surplus right-of-way property shall be determined in accordance with the following procedures:

The department of transportation shall make a preliminary planning estimate of the fair market value of the property in accordance with procedures that the department may establish;

If the department of transportation's preliminary planning estimate of the fair market value of the property is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less, the property shall be appraised by an appraiser on staff with the department of transportation at no cost to the prospective purchaser;

If the department of transportation's preliminary planning estimate or subsequent staff appraisal of the fair market value of the property is greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the property shall be appraised by an independent appraiser whose services shall be procured by the department of transportation in accordance with state law. The independent appraiser must be licensed and certified by the Tennessee real estate appraiser commission and shall be selected from a list of prequalified appraisers approved by the department of transportation. The prospective purchaser shall pay the department of transportation in advance for the cost of the independent appraisal;

The initial appraisal shall be subject to review and approval by the department of transportation in accordance with procedures that the department of transportation may establish. The appraisal review shall be conducted, at the department of transportation's expense, by a review appraiser who is licensed and certified by the Tennessee real estate appraiser commission and who is either employed by or under contract with the department of transportation. The review appraiser shall either approve the initial appraisal or reject the initial appraisal and reappraise the property to determine the fair market value of the property, subject to the approval of the director of the right-of-way division of the department of transportation or the director's designee. If approved by the director or the director's designee, the review appraiser's determination shall be presented to a prospective purchaser as the fair market value of the property;

If a prospective purchaser does not accept the appraised fair market value of the property as determined by the review appraiser, the prospective purchaser may request a final review and reconsideration by the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall obtain a final review of the appraisal by a review appraiser who is licensed and certified by the Tennessee real estate appraiser commission and who is either employed by or under contract with the department of transportation; provided, however, that the final review appraiser shall not be the same person who previously reviewed the initial appraisal. The prospective purchaser shall be given the opportunity to present information concerning the value of the property for the consideration of the final review appraiser. The final review appraiser shall consider all relevant information, including any appraisal previously performed by or for the department of transportation, and shall have the authority to reappraise or make adjustments in the appraised fair market value, in accordance with generally accepted professional standards and guidelines. The final review appraiser's determination of the fair market value of the property shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee; and

The department's final determination of the fair market value of the property is subject to the concurrence of the commissioner of general services;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation's staff appraisal of a tract of surplus real property under subdivision (a)(8)(C)(ii) is equal to or less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the department may transfer its interest in the property to any legal governmental body for the appraised value of the property, subject to the former owner's right of first refusal under subdivision (a)(8)(B), without further appraisal or approval under this section, except for the appraisal review provided in subdivision (a)(8)(C)(iv);

If property acquired by the department of transportation for a right-of-way through the exercise of eminent domain or otherwise is determined by the commissioner of transportation to be no longer needed by the department of transportation, and the excess property is not transferred to another state agency or conveyed to some other legal governmental body as provided in this section, and the excess property is not disposed of in accordance with subdivision (a)(8), the excess property shall be disposed of by the department of general services in accordance with the following procedures:

The excess property shall be sold to any adjoining property owner or the former owner of that property at fair market value. All funds collected from the sale of the property shall be paid into the highway fund, as provided in subdivision (a)(7);

The costs associated with the conveyance of the land, including, but not limited to, the cost of appraising and surveying the property, shall be reimbursed to the state by the purchaser of the property;

Any conveyance of the property made pursuant to this subsection (a) shall be subject to approval in advance by the state building commission;

If no adjoining property owner or the former owner of that property is able and willing to purchase the excess property at fair market value, then the excess property may be disposed of in accordance with existing statutes;

For the purposes of this subsection (a), the fair market value of the excess property shall initially be determined by the state through procedures established by the state building commission. If such initial determination of fair market value is deemed unacceptable by the intended purchaser, the fair market value of the excess property shall then be determined by averaging the state's initial determination of fair market value with two (2) additional fair market value appraisals of the excess property. The two (2) additional appraisals shall be performed by two (2) nonassociated appraisers from the locality in which the property is located. The two (2) appraisers shall be mutually agreed upon by the parties to the conveyance; none of the appraisers involved shall have any personal or financial interest in the conveyance;

The former property owner's right shall terminate ten (10) years after the date of acquisition by the department of transportation by conveyance or date of taking in condemnation of the subject property by the department. The former property owner's right shall not transfer to such owner's heirs. The former property owner shall have the first right of refusal to purchase the right-of-way. If the former property owner relinquishes such owner's right, the adjoining property owners interested in purchasing the right-of-way shall submit sealed bids with the minimum bid price being the fair market value determined by appraisal;

If approved by the department of transportation, and the federal highway administration where required by federal law, the department of general services may accept real property in exchange for the excess real property conveyed if the replacement property is at least equal in fair market value to the excess property being replaced. The fair market value of the replacement property shall be determined in accordance with the procedures for determining the fair market value of the excess property established in this subdivision (a)(9);

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, any funds collected from the lease of surplus state real property for communications relay apparatus or antennae sites that would otherwise be paid into the general fund of the state pursuant to subdivision (a)(7) shall be specifically earmarked for maintenance of state park facilities, including furniture, fixtures and equipment. Any such funds that are unencumbered or unexpended at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the state general fund, but shall be carried forward until expended for the purposes stated in this section;

(A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(9) or any other law to the contrary, when and if the state transfers to the local government in which any tract or combination of tracts of property which are contiguous to one another and exceed twenty (20) acres in size and which were acquired by the department of transportation as part of an uncompleted and cancelled interstate and defense highway right-of-way in a county with a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is located, the transfer shall be subject to final approval by the state building commission and shall only be used for redevelopment pursuant to subdivision (a)(11)(B);

Any property transferred pursuant to subdivision (a)(11)(A) shall be subject to the following restrictions:

Development by the local government of a flowering-tree landscaped parkway-type roadway in accordance with title 54, chapter 17, part 1;

Development of the remaining property, with priority given to subdivision (a)(11)(B)(ii)(a ), for:

Housing; provided, that some of the land is used for development of affordable housing with the needs of the community for affordable housing properly addressed in that use;

School land;

Park land;

Public spaces; and

Associated mixed-use neighborhood uses; and

The roadway involved herein from the end of Sam Cooper Boulevard to East Parkway and all the land involved herein shall conform to the limitations regulating scenic highways as in § 54-17-109, except for § 54-17-109(11); and

The commissioner of general services shall notify the house of representatives and senate member or members from the district in which the property to be sold or conveyed is located, and the notification shall be at least twenty (20) days prior to the agreement of sale or conveyance.

This section and § 4-15-102 do not apply to timber which is harvested and sold pursuant to bona fide timber management practices. For the purpose of harvesting and selling of timber pursuant to bona fide timber management practices, the timber shall be treated as personal property and sold pursuant to rules and regulations of the procurement commission as provided in part 4 of this chapter.

This section and § 4-15-102 do not apply to leasing surplus state real property under crop lease arrangements by the Tennessee wildlife resources agency which shall be responsible for the leasing of such surplus state real property for crop leases, as well as being responsible for the administration of all crop leases; such leasing and administration shall be through procedures reviewed and approved by the state building commission.

The funds so collected from the sale and conveyance of such property not otherwise specified shall be paid into the general fund of the state; provided, that all expenses incurred during such sale shall be paid from the proceeds and the balance of such proceeds shall be deposited into the general fund, except where otherwise provided by law. In instances in which other law specifies that the proceeds be deposited into a fund other than the general fund or into a special account in the general fund, the expenses of such sale or conveyance shall be paid from such other fund or special account. The funds so collected from the sale and conveyance of any property which has been deemed surplus right-of-way held for the use or benefit of the department of transportation shall be paid into the highway fund, and all expenses incurred during such sale shall be paid from the highway fund;

(A) If the property was acquired by or for the use of the department of transportation for right-of-way, if its fair market value does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) or such amounts in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) as may be approved by the state building commission, and if any adjoining property owner or the former owner of that property wishes to purchase the property, or if a legal governmental body wishes to acquire the property for a public use purpose under this subdivision (a)(8)(A) or subdivision (a)(8)(B), or if a legal governmental body wishes to acquire the property for fair market value as provided in subdivision (a)(8)(D), then this subdivision (a)(8) shall apply, notwithstanding any other provision of this section. Instead, the commissioner of transportation is authorized to declare the property surplus if the commissioner determines that the purpose of its acquisition has been completed and that the property is no longer needed by the department of transportation or another state agency, and may sell it to any adjoining property owner or the former owner of that property, for an amount representing not less than the fair market value, together with costs; provided, however, that the department of transportation may convey the property or any interest in the property by negotiated sale or disposal to any legal governmental body for a public use purpose, subject to reversion to the department of transportation for failure to continue public ownership and use. If approved by the department of transportation, and the federal highway administration where required by federal law, the department of transportation may accept real property in exchange for the surplus real property conveyed if the replacement property is at least equal in fair market value to the surplus property being replaced. The fair market value of the replacement property shall be determined in accordance with the procedures for determining the fair market value of the surplus property established in this subdivision (a)(8). The commissioner of general services shall concur in the fair market value amount or in the negotiated sale or disposal of the property to a legal governmental body for a public use purpose. If in the judgment of the department of transportation a survey of the property is required, the prospective purchaser shall pay the department of transportation in advance for the cost of the survey;

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, if property acquired by or for the use of the department of transportation for right-of-way has not been disposed of in accordance with subdivision (a)(8) or (a)(9) and no person or entity, including the former owner of that property, has been able and willing to purchase the property within five (5) years after the date the property has been offered for sale by the department of transportation, then the property may be sold at public auction pursuant to rules promulgated by the commissioner of transportation.

Acts 1953, ch. 258, § 1 (Williams, § 423.25a); 1974, ch. 621, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 564, § 1; 1977, ch. 37, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-212; Acts 1981, ch. 184, §§ 1-7; 1981, ch. 332, § 27; 1984, ch. 790, § 1; 1984, ch. 872, § 1; 1985, ch. 291, § 1; 1986, ch. 662, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 249, §§ 1-3; 1991, ch. 498, § 6; 1993, ch. 159, § 1; 1997, ch. 402, §§ 1-5; 1998, ch. 985, § 1; 1999, ch. 448, § 1; 2000, ch. 966, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 649, § 1; 2007, ch. 118, §§ 1-3; 2010, ch. 985, §§ 1-3; 2011, ch. 295, § 19; 2013, ch. 454, §§ 36, 37; 2014, ch. 561, § 1; 2018, ch. 949, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 448, § 2 provided that the act shall become operative only if the federal highway administrator advises the commissioner of transportation in writing that the provisions of the act shall not render Tennessee in violation of federal laws and regulations and subject to penalties prescribed therein.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Exemption from state purchases law, §12-3-102.

General fund deposit exception for Chickasaw Basin reserve account, §64-1-204.

Real estate appraiser commission, title 62, ch. 39, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Perpetual highway easement not subject to surplus sale, OAG 98-046, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (2/17/98).

The state can return Columbia Project lands to the original owners if the Tennessee Valley Authority transfers the lands to the state without any deed restrictions that would preclude returning the lands, and the state determines that the lands are surplus real property with an average appraised value of less than $ 25,000.00 in accordance with T.C.A. §12-2-112(a)(3), OAG 00-173, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (11/16/00).

12-2-113. Public properties may be used to promote and foster industrial development.

The state of Tennessee and the counties and cities thereof are authorized and empowered to permit use of their respective properties to promote and foster industrial development and create employment opportunities within their respective boundaries so long as such use does not unreasonably interfere with the use of such properties for their public purposes.

The state of Tennessee is specifically authorized through the governor and the commissioner of finance and administration, acting in cooperation with the state department involved, to enter into contracts with utility districts, water districts, local governments, industry or others for the sale of water from reservoirs owned by the state, in order that the purposes set forth in subsection (a) can be achieved.

Acts 1963, ch. 331, § 1; 1969, ch. 8, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 12-228.

12-2-114. State leases — Procedure.

As used in this section, “entity” means any state agency, department, or institution of higher education of the state.

When it becomes necessary for an entity to enter into a new lease as lessee, the applicable state procurement agency, in accordance with the policy of the state building commission, shall:

Prepare a general statement of the entity's space needs; and

Advertise, at the cost of the entity requesting the space, the entity's space needs on the website of the state procurement agency and in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the space is needed on at least one (1) occasion and at least two (2) weeks before proposals are opened, or as required by the policy of the state building commission, unless one (1) of the following exceptions is satisfied:

The annual rental will be less than an amount to be specified by the policy of the state building commission, the amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);

The property to be leased is owned or otherwise controlled by a city, county, or other political subdivision of the state or the federal government;

The space required by the entity has special and unique requirements as determined and approved by the state building commission; or

The term of the lease will be one (1) year or less.

When it becomes necessary for an entity to amend a lease where it is the lessee, advertising shall not be required for:

Lease renewals where the right to renew the lease and the terms of the rental rate for the renewal term were included in the original lease;

Extensions to the term of a lease by one (1) year or less beyond the expiration date set forth in the original lease; or

Other amendments to a lease, unless required by the policy of the state building commission.

Any proposal to lease space to the entity shall contain the name of any persons who are contemplated to become financially interested in the lease and shall be made readily available and accessible for public examination.

After receipt of the proposals, the state procurement agency, in accordance with the policy of the state building commission, may then negotiate with the prospective lessors for leasing of the needed space, taking into account not only the rent offered but the type of space, the location, its suitability for the purpose, services offered by the lessor, moving costs, and all other relevant factors. The state shall enter into a lease with the proposer offering the proposal with the lowest total cost, unless a statement of justification supporting award to a different proposer has been submitted to and approved by the state building commission prior to entering into the lease.

Acts 1976, ch. 842, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-252; Acts 1980, ch. 740, § 1; 1981, ch. 196, § 1; 1981, ch. 332, § 29; 1984, ch. 754, § 1; 1989, ch. 454, §§ 4, 5; 1990, ch. 734, §§ 3, 4; 1997, ch. 402, §§ 6, 7; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 36; 2015, ch. 382, § 1.

12-2-115. Approval of lease instrument where state is lessee or lessor.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no lease of property to the state government or any agency, department, institution or office thereof shall be entered into unless the instrument of lease is first approved as to form and legality by the attorney general and reporter. This provision shall only apply to leases which are longer than five (5) years or if the consideration for any such lease amounts to more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per year.

If any proposed lease of property by or to the state government or any agency, department, institution or office thereof is longer than five (5) years or if the consideration for any such lease amounts to more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per year or such other amount as determined by the state building commission, it shall first be submitted to and approved by the state building commission.

With respect to any lease of property that is not submitted to and approved by the state building commission, the office of the state architect shall, subject to such exceptions as the commission may by its policies direct, post on its website at a minimum the following information, as applicable, regarding each such lease:

Name or names of lessor or lessors and lessee or lessees;

Lease description and purpose;

Lease term;

Rental rate, stated as total rent for the lease term, annual rent, and as a rent per square foot;

Source or sources of funding;

Procurement method used to obtain the lease; and

Any other information as directed by the commission.

In addition to the above, the state architect shall post on the office's website any changes to information posted in accordance with this subdivision (b)(2) as soon as practicable after the change is authorized.

The state architect shall ensure that all information posted on the office's website pursuant to this subsection (b) is set forth in a manner and format consistent with the policies and procedures of the commission.

No lease of property to the state government or any agency, department, institution or office thereof shall be valid unless the requirements of this section are met.

Notwithstanding the language in § 9-4-5113 to the contrary, leases of property to the state government or any agency, department, institution or office thereof, the total cost of which is less than an amount determined pursuant to policy established by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the state building commission, need not be certified, as indicated in § 9-4-5113, by the commissioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 585, § 1; 1978, ch. 943, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-253; Acts 1984, ch. 754, § 2; 1985, ch. 291, § 2; 1989, ch. 454, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 498, § 5; 1997, ch. 402, §§ 8-12; 2012, ch. 554, §§ 1, 2.